Arkansas, session 2025, SB249.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. Arkansas Code § 17-31-105(a), concerning violations and
penalties related to forestry, is amended to read as follows:
(a)(1) Any person required to be registered under this chapter shall
be guilty of a Class A misdemeanor if that person The Arkansas Forestry
Commission may impose a civil penalty not to exceed five thousand dollars
($5,000) on a person required to be registered under this chapter if that
person:
(1)(A) Practices or offers to practice forestry without a
valid certificate of registration issued pursuant to this chapter;
(2)(B) Claims to be a forester certified under this chapter
without being so certified;
(3)(C) In any way tends to convey the impression that he or
she is a forester certified under the provisions of this chapter without
being so registered;
*LGL064*
02/18/2025 9:26:35 AM LGL064

SB249
(4)(D) Uses as his or her own the certificate of
registration of another;
(5)(E) Gives false or forged evidence to the Department of
Agriculture or the Arkansas Forestry Commission commission;
(6)(F) Uses an expired or revoked certificate; or
(7)(G) Violates any provision of this chapter.
(2) In addition to a civil penalty under subdivision (a)(1) of
this section, a person who violates subdivision (a)(1) of this section upon
conviction is guilty of a Class A misdemeanor.

SECTION 2. Arkansas Code § 17-31-204, concerning the powers of the
Arkansas Forestry Commission, is amended to add an additional subsection to
read as follows:
(d) The commission may promulgate rules to establish a penalty matrix
for violations of the offenses under § 17-31-105(a).





















02/18/2025 9:26:35 AM LGL064